Vermont, session 2025-2026, H262.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 21 V.S.A. § 495q is added to read:
§ 495q. ELECTRONIC MONITORING OF EMPLOYEES; AUTOMATED
DECISION SYSTEMS; RESTRICTIONS; EXCEPTIONS
(a) Definitions. As used in this section:
VT LEG #378587 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.262
2025 Page 2 of 18
(1) “Algorithm” means a computerized procedure consisting of a set of
steps used to accomplish a determined task.
(2) “Automated decision system” means an algorithm or computational
process that is used to make or assist in making employment-related decisions,
judgments, or conclusions. The term “automated decision system” includes
algorithms and computational processes that are derived from machine
learning, statistics, data processing, or artificial intelligence.
(3) “Automated decision system output” means information, data,
assumptions, predictions, scoring, recommendations, decisions, or conclusions
generated by an automated decision system.
(4) “Data” means information obtained by any means that, directly or
indirectly, identifies, relates to, describes, may reasonably be associated with,
or could reasonably be linked to an employee, including:
(A) personal identifying information;
(B) biometric information;
(C) health, medical, lifestyle, and wellness information;
(D) information related to workplace activities;
(E) human resources information and personnel files; and
(F) information related to the employee’s internet and digital
activities, including electronic communications, private social media activity,
and personal internet protocol address.
VT LEG #378587 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.262
2025 Page 3 of 18
(5) “Electronic monitoring” means the collection of information
concerning employee activities or communication by any means other than
direct, in-person observation, including through the use of a digital device;
computer; telephone; wire; radio; camera; or electromagnetic, photoelectronic,
or photo-optical system.
(6) “Employee” means an individual who in consideration of direct or
indirect gain or profit is employed by an employer. As used in this section,
“employee” includes job applicants and independent contractors providing
services, directly or indirectly, to an employer.
(7) “Employer” means a person who directly or indirectly employs or
exercises control over the wages, benefits, other compensation, hours, working
conditions, access to work or job opportunities, or other terms and conditions
of employment of an employee. For purposes of this section, “employer”
includes the employer’s agents, labor contractors, or other affiliates or
subcontractors through which individuals perform work on behalf of the
employer or otherwise provide services that are integrated into the employer’s
business operations.
(8) “Employment-related decision” means any decision made by an
employer that:
(A) affects an employee’s compensation, benefits, or terms and
conditions of employment;
VT LEG #378587 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.262
2025 Page 4 of 18
(B) relates to the discipline, evaluation, promotion, or termination of
an employee; or
(C) relates to the hiring of an individual or employee for a position or
job.
(9) “Essential job function” means a fundamental duty of a job or
position that an employee with that job or position must be able to perform, as
revealed by objective evidence, such as the amount of time an employee
spends performing a function, the terms of any applicable collective bargaining
agreement, the employee’s past and present work experiences, and the
employee’s performance in the position. The employer’s reasonable,
nondiscriminatory judgment as to which job functions are essential may be
relevant evidence but not the sole basis for a determination as to which
functions are essential, the determination of which requires consideration of
objective evidence.
(10) “Periodic assessment of an employee’s performance” means the
assessment of an employee’s performance over the course of units of time
equal to or greater than one calendar day.
(b) Employee monitoring restricted. An employer shall not engage in
electronic monitoring of an employee unless all of the following requirements
are met:
(1) the employer’s purpose in utilizing the electronic monitoring is to:
VT LEG #378587 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.262
2025 Page 5 of 18
(A) assist or allow the employee to accomplish an essential job
function;
(B) monitor production processes or quality;
(C) ensure compliance with applicable employment or labor laws;
(D) protect the health, safety, or security of the employee, clients, or
the public;
(E) secure the employer’s physical or digital property;
(F) conduct periodic assessment of employee performance; or
(G) track time worked or production output for purposes of
determining the employee’s compensation;
(2) the specific form of electronic monitoring is necessary to accomplish
the purpose identified pursuant to subdivision (1) of this subsection and is used
exclusively to accomplish that purpose;
(3) the specific form of electronic monitoring is the least invasive
means, with respect to the employee, of accomplishing the purpose identified
pursuant to subdivision (1) of this subsection;
(4) the specific form of electronic monitoring is used with the smallest
number of employees, collects the smallest amount of data necessary to
accomplish the purpose identified pursuant to subdivision (1) of this
subsection, and is collected not more frequently than necessary to accomplish
that purpose; and
VT LEG #378587 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.262
2025 Page 6 of 18
(5) the employer ensures that only authorized persons have access to any
data produced through the electronic monitoring and that the data is only used
for the purpose and duration that the employee has been notified of pursuant to
subsection (c) of this section.
(c) Required notice for employee monitoring.
(1) At least 15 calendar days prior to commencing any form of
electronic monitoring, an employer shall provide notice of the electronic
monitoring to each employee who will be subject to it. The notice shall, at a
minimum, include the following information:
(A) the specific form of electronic monitoring;
(B) a description of the intended purpose of the electronic monitoring
and why the electronic monitoring is necessary to accomplish that purpose;
(C) a description of how any data generated by the electronic
monitoring will be used, including whether and how the data generated by the
electronic monitoring will be used to inform employment-related decisions;
(D) a description of the technologies that will be used to conduct the
electronic monitoring;
(E) a description of the specific activities, locations, communications,
and job roles that will be electronically monitored;
VT LEG #378587 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.262
2025 Page 7 of 18
(F) the name of any person conducting electronic monitoring on the
employer’s behalf and any associated contract language related to the
monitoring;
(G) the name of any person, apart from the employer, who will have
access to any data generated by the electronic monitoring and the reason why
the person will have access to the data;
(H) the positions within the employer that will have access to any
data generated by the electronic monitoring;
(I) when, where, and how frequently monitoring will occur;
(J) the period of time for which any data generated by the electronic
monitoring will be retained by the employer or another person and when that
data will be destroyed;
(K) notice of how an employee may access the data generated by the
electronic monitoring and the process to correct any errors in the data;
(L) a cover sheet that concisely summarizes the details contained in
the notice;
(M) notice of an employee’s rights pursuant to this section and the
judicial and administrative remedies available for redressing the wrongful use
of electronic monitoring; and
(N) instructions on how an employee can file a complaint against an
employer for violations of this section.
VT LEG #378587 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.262
2025 Page 8 of 18
(2) If an employer uses electronic monitoring to track employee
productivity or performance, the employer shall include the following
information in the notice required by subdivision (1) of this subsection:
(A) the performance or productivity standards by which employees
will be assessed and how employees will be measured against those standards;
(B) how performance or productivity data will be monitored and
collected, including the identity of the employees subject to such monitoring
and when, where, and how the monitoring and data collection will occur; and
(C) any adverse consequences for failing to meet a performance or
productivity standard and whether there is any bonus or incentive program
associated with meeting or exceeding each standard.
(3)(A) Notice of electronic monitoring provided pursuant to this section
shall be written in plain, clear, and concise language and provided to each
employee in the employee’s primary language.
(B) An employer shall provide a new, updated notice to employees if
it makes any significant changes to the manner of electronic monitoring or to
the way that the employer utilizes the electronic monitoring or any data
generated by it.
(4) Notwithstanding subdivisions (1) and (2) of this subsection, prior
notice of electronic monitoring shall not be required if:
VT LEG #378587 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.262
2025 Page 9 of 18
(A) the employer has reasonable grounds to believe that the
employee is engaged in conduct that:
(i) is illegal;
(ii) violates the legal rights of the employer or another employee;
or
(iii) creates a hostile work environment; and
(B) the electronic monitoring is reasonably likely to produce
evidence of the conduct, is otherwise conducted in compliance with the
previsions of this section, and is narrowly tailored to the purpose of identifying
the conduct.
(5)(A) An employer that utilizes electronic monitoring shall annually
provide each of its employees with a list of all electronic monitoring systems
currently in use by the employer in relation to that employee. The list shall be
provided in the primary language of the employee.
(B) As used in this subdivision (5), “currently in use” means that the
employer:
(i) is currently using the system in relation to the employee;
(ii) used the electronic monitoring system in relation to the
employee within the past 90 days; or
(iii) intends to use the electronic monitoring system in relation to
the employee within the next 30 days.
VT LEG #378587 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.262
2025 Page 10 of 18
(d) Prohibitions on employee monitoring. Notwithstanding the purposes
for electronic monitoring set forth in subdivision (b)(1) of this section,
electronic monitoring shall not be used:
(1) in any manner that violates State or federal labor, employment, civil
rights, or human rights laws;
(2) in relation to employees who are off-duty and not performing work-
related tasks, including employees on-call;
(3) to identify, punish, or obtain information about employees exercising
legal rights, including rights guaranteed by labor and employment laws;
(4) for audio-visual monitoring of bathrooms, locker rooms, changing
areas, breakrooms, smoking areas, areas designated for the expression of breast
milk, employee cafeterias, lounges, or other similarly private areas;
(5) to determine the frequency with which employees visit or use
bathrooms, locker rooms, changing areas, breakrooms, smoking areas,
employee cafeterias, lounges, or other similarly private areas;
(6) for monitoring, including audio-visual monitoring, of any space
within an employee’s residence or personal vehicle, or a property owned or
rented by the employee, unless the monitoring is necessary to ensure the
employee’s health and safety or to verify the security of employer or client
data;
VT LEG #378587 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.262
2025 Page 11 of 18
(7) to obtain information about an employee’s actual or perceived age,
color, disability, ethnicity, genetic information, limited proficiency in the
English language, national origin, race, religion, pursuit or receipt of
reproductive health care, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression,
marital status, family responsibilities, personal appearance, immigration status,
political affiliation or association, neurodiversity, veteran status, or other
classification protected under State or federal law;
(8) to take adverse employment action against an employee on the basis
of data collected via continuous incremental time-tracking tools; or
(9) in a manner that harms health or safety or violates the legal rights of
any employee.
(e) Restriction of employee monitoring through personal devices.
(1) An employer shall not require an employee to install an application
on a personal device for purposes of electronic monitoring or to wear a device
or attach, embed, or physically implant a device on the employee’s clothing
that can be used for electronic monitoring, unless the electronic monitoring is:
(A) necessary to accomplish the employee’s essential job function;
and
(B) limited to only the times and activities necessary to accomplish
the essential job functions.
VT LEG #378587 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.262
2025 Page 12 of 18
(2) Any location tracking function of an application or device shall be
disabled outside of the times when the employee is engaged in activities
necessary to accomplish essential job functions.
(3) An employer shall not require an employee to physically implant a
device on the employee’s body for purposes of employee monitoring.
(f) Restrictions on use of automated decision systems.
(1) An employer shall not use an automated decision system in a manner
that:
(A) violates or results in a violation of State or federal law;
(B) makes predictions about an employee’s behavior that are
unrelated to the employee’s essential job functions;
(C) identifies, profiles, or predicts the likelihood that an employee
will exercise the employee’s legal rights;
(D) makes predictions about an employee’s emotions, personality, or
other sentiments; or
(E) use customer or client data, including customer or client reviews
and feedback, as an input of the automated decision system.
(2)(A) An employer shall not solely rely on outputs from an automated
decision system when making employment-related decisions.
(B) An employer may utilize an automated decision system in
making employment-related decisions if:
VT LEG #378587 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.262
2025 Page 13 of 18
(i) the automated decision system outputs considered in making
the employment-related decision are corroborated by human oversight of the
employee, including supervisory or managerial observations and
documentation of the employee’s work, personnel records, and consultations
with the employee’s coworkers;
(ii) the employer has conducted an impact assessment of the
automated decision system pursuant to subsection (g) of this section; and
(iii) the employer is in compliance with the notice requirements of
subdivision (4) of this subsection (f).
(3) An employer shall not use any automated decision system outputs
regarding an employee’s physical or mental health in relation to an
employment-related decision.
(4) Prior to using an automated decision system to make an
employment-related decision about an employee, the employer must provide
the employee with a notice that complies with subdivision (c)(3)(A) of this
section and, at a minimum, contains the following information:
(A) a plain language explanation of the nature, purpose, and scope
for which the automated decision system will be used, including the specific
employment-related decisions potentially affected;
(B) the logic used in the automated decision system, including the
key parameters that affect the output of the automated decision system;
VT LEG #378587 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.262
2025 Page 14 of 18
(C) the specific category and sources of employee input data that the
automated decision system will use, including a specific description of any
data collected through electronic monitoring;
(D) any performance metrics the employer will consider using with
the automated decision system;
(E) the type of outputs the automated decision system will produce;
(F) the individuals or entities that developed the automated decision
system;
(G) the individual or entities that will operate, monitor, and interpret
the results of the automated decision system;
(H) information about how an employee can access the results of the
most recent impact assessment of the automated decision system;
(I) a description of an employee’s rights, pursuant to subsection (j) of
this section, to access information about the employer’s use of the automated
decision system and to correct data used by the automated decision system;
and
(J) a statement that employees are protected from retaliation for
exercising the rights described in the notice.
(g) Impact assessment of automated decision systems.
(1) Prior to utilizing an automated decision system, an employer shall
create a written impact assessment of the system that includes, at a minimum:
VT LEG #378587 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.262
2025 Page 15 of 18
(A) a detailed description of the automated decision system and its
purpose;
(B) a description of the data utilized by the system;
(C) a description of the outputs produced by the system and the types
of employment-related decisions in which those outputs may be utilized;
(D) an assessment of the necessity for the system, including reasons
for utilizing the system to supplement nonautomated means of decision
making;
(E) a detailed assessment of the system’s validity and reliability in
accordance with contemporary social science standards and a description of
any metrics used to evaluate the performance and known limitations of the
automated decision system;
(F) a detailed assessment of the potential risks of utilizing the system,
including the risk of:
(i) discrimination against employees on the basis of race, color,
religion, national origin, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, ancestry,
place of birth, age, crime victim status, or physical or mental condition;
(ii) violating employees’ legal rights or chilling employees’
exercise of legal rights;
(iii) directly or indirectly harming employees’ physical health,
mental health, safety, sense of well-being, dignity, or autonomy;
VT LEG #378587 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.262
2025 Page 16 of 18
(iv) harm to employee privacy, including through potential
security breaches or inadvertent disclosure of information; and
(v) negative economic and material impacts to employees,
including potential effects on compensation, benefits, work conditions,
evaluations, advancement, and work opportunities;
(G) a detailed summary of measures taken by the employer to
address or mitigate the risks identified pursuant to subdivision (E) of this
subdivision (1); and
(H) a description of any methodology used in preparing the
assessment.
(2) An employer shall provide a copy of the assessment prepared
pursuant to subdivision (1) of this subsection to an employee upon request.
(3) An employer shall update the assessment required pursuant to this
subsection any time a significant change or update is made to the automated
decision system.
(4) A single impact assessment may address a comparable set of
automated decision systems deployed by an employer.
(h) Prohibitions on facial, gait, voice, and emotion recognition technology.
Electronic monitoring and automated decision systems shall not incorporate
any form of facial, gait, voice, or emotion recognition technology.
(i) Protection of employee privacy.
VT LEG #378587 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.262
2025 Page 17 of 18
(1) An employer; any person that develops, operates, or maintains
electronic monitoring or an automated decision system on behalf of an
employer; and any person who collects, stores, analyzes, interprets,
disseminates, or otherwise uses data produced or utilized by electronic
monitoring or an automated decision system shall implement reasonable
security procedures and practices appropriate to the nature of the data to
protect employees’ personal information from unauthorized or illegal access,
destruction, use, modification, or disclosure.
(2) Any person that develops, operates, or maintains electronic
monitoring or an automated decision system on behalf of an employer and any
person who collects, stores, analyzes, interprets, disseminates, or otherwise
uses data produced or utilized by electronic monitoring or an automated
decision system shall, upon termination of the contract with the employer:
(A) return all data and automated decision system outputs to the
employer; and
(B) destroy all data and automated decision system outputs in the
person’s possession.
(j) Employee right to access and correct data.
(1) Within seven days of receiving a request, an employer shall provide
an employee with access to any data that relates to the employee that was
VT LEG #378587 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.262
2025 Page 18 of 18
produced or utilized by electronic monitoring or an automated decision system
used by the employer.
(2) Within seven days of receiving a request to correct potential errors
identified by an employee, an employer shall:
(A) correct the erroneous information or data and provide the
employee with a notice that complies with subdivision (c)(3)(A) of this
section, explaining the steps taken by the employer; or
(B) provide the employee with a notice explaining that the employer
has not corrected the information or data and describing the steps the employer
has taken to verify the accuracy of the disputed information or data.
(k) Retaliation prohibited. An employer shall not discharge or in any other
manner retaliate against an employee who exercises or attempts to exercise the
employee’s rights under this section. The provisions against retaliation set
forth in subdivision 495(a)(8) of this subchapter shall apply to this section.
(l) Enforcement. The provisions of section 495b of this subchapter shall
apply to this section.
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
VT LEG #378587 v.1